www/vendor/hunspell/mg_MG3.aff
# mg_MG.aff - affix file for myspell-mg
#
#   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#   the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#   (at your option) any later version.
#
#   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#   GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#   along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#   Foundation, Inc., 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA.


# ty vakina : https://www.chromium.org/developers/how-tos/editing-the-spell-checking-dictionaries
# exemple : https://github.com/elastic/hunspell/blob/master/dicts/en_US/en_US.aff
# ty complete tsara https://manpages.ubuntu.com/manpages/trusty/en/man4/hunspell.4.html
#

SET UTF-8

TRY aeiuonrtldspjgkmhbcyfvwzqxSNRTLCGDMPHBEAUYOFIVKWZQJX

REP 2
REP ha a
REP a ha

#MAP

KEY azertyuiop|qsdfghjklmù|wxcvbn|aéz|yèu|iço|oàp|aqz|zse|edr|rft|tgy|yhu|uji|iko|olpm|qws|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj

ICONV 42
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬅ ft
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV ﬆ st
ICONV ſ s
ICONV à à
ICONV â â
ICONV ä ä
ICONV é é
ICONV è è
ICONV ê ê
ICONV ë ë
ICONV î î
ICONV ï ï
ICONV ô ô
ICONV ö ö
ICONV ù ù
ICONV û û
ICONV ü ü
ICONV ÿ ÿ
ICONV ç ç
ICONV À À
ICONV Â Â
ICONV Ä Ä
ICONV É É
ICONV È È
ICONV Ê Ê
ICONV Ë Ë
ICONV Î Î
ICONV Ï Ï
ICONV Ô Ô
ICONV Ö Ö
ICONV Ù Ù
ICONV Û Û
ICONV Ü Ü
ICONV Ÿ Ÿ
ICONV Ç Ç

OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’



FLAG long

FULLSTRIP

NEEDAFFIX ()

FORBIDDENWORD {}

CIRCUMFIX Xx

KEEPCASE ||

NOSUGGEST --

BREAK 5
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ‘
BREAK '



SFX Zk Y 1
SFX Zk 0 m [aeo]

SFX Zj Y 1
SFX Zj 0 n [aeo]

SFX Zi Y 1
SFX Zi 0 ko [aeo]

SFX Zh Y 1
SFX Zh 0 nao [aeo]

SFX Zg Y 1
SFX Zg 0 ny [aeo]

SFX Zf Y 1
SFX Zf 0 ntsika [aeo]

SFX Ze Y 1
SFX Ze 0 nay [aeo]

SFX Zd Y 1
SFX Zd 0 nareo [aeo]

SFX Zs Y 1
SFX Zs a 0 .

SFX Zb Y 1
SFX Zb ka 0 .

SFX Za Y 1
SFX Za ka ky .

SFX Z9 Y 1
SFX Z9 a o .

SFX Z8 Y 1
SFX Z8 a ao .

SFX Z7 Y 1
SFX Z7 ka ny .

SFX Z6 Y 1
SFX Z6 ka tsika .

SFX Z5 Y 1
SFX Z5 0 y .

SFX Z4 Y 1
SFX Z4 0 reo .

PFX Yz Y 1
PFX Yz 0 m [aeio]

PFX Yy Y 1
PFX Yy 0 n [aeio]

PFX Yx Y 1
PFX Yx 0 h [aeio]

PFX Yw Y 1
PFX Yw 0 h [aeio]

SFX Yv Y 1
SFX Yv ika eho .

PFX Yw Y 1
PFX Yw 0 h/Xx [aeio]

SFX Yu Y 1
SFX Yu ika eho/Xx .
